Illinois, session 104th, SB2044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1192 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1192 new)7    Sec. 5-1192. Web-based signature. A county may allow a 8person to sign any document with a web-based signature if the 9county uses a secure web-based platform. This Section does not 10apply to a nominating or candidate petition or a referendum 11petition. 12    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 1385-70 as follows: 14    (60 ILCS 1/85-70 new)15    Sec. 85-70. Web-based signature. A township may allow a 16person to sign any document with a web-based signature if the 17township uses a secure web-based platform. This Section does 18not apply to a nominating or candidate petition or a 19referendum petition. 20    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by   SB2044 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1adding Section 1-1-13 as follows: 2    (65 ILCS 5/1-1-13 new)3    Sec. 1-1-13. Web-based signature. A municipality may allow 4a person to sign any document with a web-based signature if the 5municipality uses a secure web-based platform. This Section 6does not apply to a nominating or candidate petition or a 7referendum petition. 8    Section 20. The Conservation District Act is amended by 9changing Section 12 as follows: 10    (70 ILCS 410/12)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 7112)11    Sec. 12. To the extent necessary to carry out the purpose 12of this Act and in addition to any other powers, duties and 13functions vested in a district by law, but subject to such 14limitations and restrictions as are imposed elsewhere by this 15Act or another law, a district is authorized and empowered:16    (a) To adopt by-laws, adopt and use a common seal, enter 17into contracts, acquire and hold real and personal estate and 18take such other actions as may be necessary for the proper 19conduct of its affairs.20    (b) To make and publish all ordinances, rules and 21regulations necessary for the management and protection of its 22property and the conduct of its affairs.23    (c) To study and ascertain the district's wildland and   SB2044 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1other open space resources and outdoor recreation facilities, 2the need for preserving such resources and providing such 3facilities and the extent to which such needs are being 4currently met and to prepare and adopt a co-ordinated plan of 5areas and facilities to meet such needs.6    (d) To acquire by gift, legacy, purchase, condemnation in 7the manner provided for the exercise of the right of eminent 8domain under the Eminent Domain Act, lease, agreement or 9otherwise the fee or any lesser right or interest in real 10property and to hold the same with or without public access for 11open space, wildland, scenic roadway, pathway, outdoor 12recreation, or other conservation benefits. A district that is 13entirely within a county of under 200,000 inhabitants and 14contiguous to a county of more than 2,000,000 inhabitants and 15that is authorized by referendum as provided in subsection (d) 16of Section 15 to incur indebtedness over 0.575% but not to 17exceed 1.725% may acquire an interest in real estate by 18condemnation only if approved by an affirmative vote of 19two-thirds of the total number of trustees authorized for that 20district; such a district may exchange, sell, or otherwise 21dispose of any portion of any interest in real estate acquired 22by it by any means within 2 years of acquiring that interest, 23provided that a public hearing on the exchange, sale or other 24disposition of such real estate or interest therein is held 25prior to such action.26    The Department of Natural Resources, the county board, or   SB2044 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1the governing body of any municipality, district or public 2corporation may, upon request of the conservation district, 3set apart and transfer any real or personal property owned or 4controlled by it and not devoted or dedicated to any other 5inconsistent public use, to the conservation district. In 6acquiring or accepting land or rights thereto, due 7consideration shall be given to its open space, outdoor 8recreation or other conservation values and no real property 9shall be acquired or accepted which in the opinion of the 10district or the Department of Natural Resources is of low 11value from the standpoint of its proposed use.12    (e) To classify, designate, plan, develop, preserve, 13administer and maintain all areas, places and facilities in 14which it has an interest, and construct, reconstruct, alter 15and renew buildings and other structures, and equip and 16maintain the same.17    (f) To accept gifts, grants, legacies, contributions and 18appropriations of money and other personal property for 19conservation purposes.20    (g) To employ and fix the compensation of an executive 21officer who shall be responsible to the board for the carrying 22out of its policies. The executive officer shall have the 23power, subject to the approval of the board, to employ and fix 24the compensation of such assistants and employees as the board 25may consider necessary for carrying out the purposes and 26provisions of this Act.  SB2044 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    (h) To charge and collect reasonable fees for the use of 2such facilities, privileges and conveniences as may be 3provided.4    (i) To police its property and to exercise police powers 5in respect thereto or in respect to the enforcement of any rule 6or regulation provided by the ordinances of the district and 7to employ and commission police officers and other qualified 8persons to enforce the same.9    (j) To undertake studies pertaining to the natural 10history, archaeology, history or conservation of natural 11resources of the county.12    (k) To lease land for a period not longer than 50 years 13from the date of the lease to a responsible person, firm, or 14corporation for construction, reconstruction, alteration, 15renewal, equipment, furnishing, extension, development, 16operation and maintenance of lodges, housekeeping and sleeping 17cabins, swimming pools, golf courses, campgrounds, sand 18beaches, marinas, convention and entertainment centers, roads 19and parking areas, and other related buildings and facilities. 20In any lease of land leased pursuant to this subsection (k), 21upon expiration of the lease title to all structures on the 22leased land shall be vested in the district.23    (l) To lease any building or facility constructed, 24reconstructed, altered, renewed, equipped, furnished, 25extended, developed, and maintained by the district to a 26responsible person, firm, or corporation for operation or   SB2044 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1development, or both, and maintenance for a period not longer 2than 20 years from the date of the lease.3    (m) To allow a person to sign any document with a web-based 4signature if the district uses a secure web-based platform. 5(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.) 6    Section 25. The Downstate Forest Preserve District Act is 7amended by adding Section 13.9 as follows: 8    (70 ILCS 805/13.9 new)9    Sec. 13.9. Web-based signature. A forest preserve district 10may allow a person to sign any document with a web-based 11signature if the forest preserve district uses a secure 12web-based platform. This Section does not apply to a 13nominating or candidate petition or a referendum petition. 14    Section 30. The Cook County Forest Preserve District Act 15is amended by adding Section 42.5 as follows: 16    (70 ILCS 810/42.5 new)17    Sec. 42.5. Web-based signature. A forest preserve district 18may allow a person to sign any document with a web-based 19signature if the forest preserve district uses a secure 20web-based platform. This Section does not apply to a 21nominating or candidate petition or a referendum petition.   SB2044 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    Section 35. The Park District Code is amended by changing 2Section 8-1 as follows: 3    (70 ILCS 1205/8-1)  (from Ch. 105, par. 8-1)4    Sec. 8-1. General corporate powers. Every park district 5shall, from the time of its organization, be a body corporate 6and politic by the name set forth in the petition for its 7organization, the specific name set forth in this Code, or the 8name it may adopt under Section 8-9 and shall have and exercise 9the following powers:10        (a) To adopt a corporate seal and alter the same at 11    pleasure; to sue and be sued; and to contract in 12    furtherance of any of its corporate purposes.13        (b)(1) To acquire by gift, legacy, grant or purchase, 14    or by condemnation in the manner provided for the exercise 15    of the power of eminent domain under the Eminent Domain 16    Act, any and all real estate, or rights therein necessary 17    for building, laying out, extending, adorning and 18    maintaining any such parks, boulevards and driveways, or 19    for effecting any of the powers or purposes granted under 20    this Code as its board may deem proper, whether such lands 21    be located within or without such district; but no park 22    district, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this 23    subsection, shall have any power of condemnation in the 24    manner provided for the exercise of the power of eminent 25    domain under the Eminent Domain Act or otherwise as to any   SB2044 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    real estate, lands, riparian rights or estate, or other 2    property situated outside of such district, but shall only 3    have power to acquire the same by gift, legacy, grant or 4    purchase, and such district shall have the same control of 5    and power over lands so acquired without the district as 6    over parks, boulevards and driveways within such district.7        (2) In addition to the powers granted in paragraph (1) 8    of subsection (b), a park district located in more than 9    one county, the majority of its territory located in a 10    county over 450,000 in population and none of its 11    territory located in a county over 1,000,000 in 12    population, shall have condemnation power in the manner 13    provided for the exercise of the power of eminent domain 14    under the Eminent Domain Act or as otherwise granted by 15    law as to any and all real estate situated up to one mile 16    outside of such district which is not within the 17    boundaries of another park district.18        (c) To acquire by gift, legacy or purchase any 19    personal property necessary for its corporate purposes 20    provided that all contracts for supplies, materials or 21    work involving an expenditure in excess of $30,000, or a 22    lower amount if required by board policy, shall be let to 23    the lowest responsible bidder after due advertisement. No 24    district shall be required to accept a bid that does not 25    meet the district's established specifications, terms of 26    delivery, quality, and serviceability requirements.   SB2044 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    Contracts which, by their nature, are not adapted to award 2    by competitive bidding, such as contracts for the services 3    of individuals possessing a high degree of professional 4    skill where the ability or fitness of the individual plays 5    an important part, contracts for the printing of finance 6    committee reports and departmental reports, contracts for 7    the printing or engraving of bonds, tax warrants and other 8    evidences of indebtedness, contracts for utility services 9    such as water, light, heat, telephone or telegraph, 10    contracts for fuel (such as diesel, gasoline, oil, 11    aviation, or propane), lubricants, or other petroleum 12    products, contracts for the use, purchase, delivery, 13    movement, or installation of data processing equipment, 14    software, or services and telecommunications and 15    interconnect equipment, software, or services, contracts 16    for duplicating machines and supplies, contracts for goods 17    or services procured from another governmental agency, 18    purchases of equipment previously owned by some entity 19    other than the district itself, and contracts for the 20    purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets and 21    reports are not subject to competitive bidding. Contracts 22    for emergency expenditures are also exempt from 23    competitive bidding when the emergency expenditure is 24    approved by 3/4 of the members of the board.25        All competitive bids for contracts involving an 26    expenditure in excess of $30,000, or a lower amount if   SB2044 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    required by board policy, must be sealed by the bidder and 2    must be opened by a member or employee of the park board at 3    a public bid opening at which the contents of the bids must 4    be announced. Each bidder must receive at least 3 days 5    notice of the time and place of the bid opening.6        For purposes of this subsection, "due advertisement" 7    includes, but is not limited to, at least one public 8    notice at least 10 days before the bid date in a newspaper 9    published in the district or, if no newspaper is published 10    in the district, in a newspaper of general circulation in 11    the area of the district.12        (d) To pass all necessary ordinances, rules and 13    regulations for the proper management and conduct of the 14    business of the board and district and to establish by 15    ordinance all needful rules and regulations for the 16    government and protection of parks, boulevards and 17    driveways and other property under its jurisdiction, and 18    to effect the objects for which such districts are formed.19        (e) To prescribe such fines and penalties for the 20    violation of ordinances as it shall deem proper not 21    exceeding $1,000 for any one offense, which fines and 22    penalties may be recovered by an action in the name of such 23    district in the circuit court for the county in which such 24    violation occurred. The park district may also seek in the 25    action, in addition to or instead of fines and penalties, 26    an order that the offender be required to make restitution   SB2044 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    for damage resulting from violations, and the court shall 2    grant such relief where appropriate. The procedure in such 3    actions shall be the same as that provided by law for like 4    actions for the violation of ordinances in cities 5    organized under the general laws of this State, and 6    offenders may be imprisoned for non-payment of fines and 7    costs in the same manner as in such cities. All fines when 8    collected shall be paid into the treasury of such 9    district.10        (f) To manage and control all officers and property of 11    such districts and to provide for joint ownership with one 12    or more cities, villages or incorporated towns of real and 13    personal property used for park purposes by one or more 14    park districts. In case of joint ownership, the terms of 15    the agreement shall be fair, just and equitable to all 16    parties and shall be set forth in a written agreement 17    entered into by the corporate authorities of each 18    participating district, city, village or incorporated 19    town.20        (g) To secure grants and loans, or either, from the 21    United States Government, or any agency or agencies 22    thereof, for financing the acquisition or purchase of any 23    and all real estate, or rights therein, or for effecting 24    any of the powers or purposes granted under this Code as 25    its Board may deem proper.26        (h) To establish fees for the use of facilities and   SB2044 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    recreational programs of the districts and to derive 2    revenue from non-resident fees from their operations. Fees 3    charged non-residents of such district need not be the 4    same as fees charged to residents of the district. 5    Charging fees or deriving revenue from the facilities and 6    recreational programs shall not affect the right to assert 7    or utilize any defense or immunity, common law or 8    statutory, available to the districts or their employees.9        (i) To make contracts for a term exceeding one year, 10    but not to exceed 3 years, notwithstanding any provision 11    of this Code to the contrary, relating to: (1) the 12    employment of a park director, superintendent, 13    administrator, engineer, health officer, land planner, 14    finance director, attorney, police chief, or other officer 15    who requires technical training or knowledge; (2) the 16    employment of outside professional consultants such as 17    engineers, doctors, land planners, auditors, attorneys, or 18    other professional consultants who require technical 19    training or knowledge; (3) the provision of data 20    processing equipment and services; and (4) the purchase of 21    energy from a utility or an alternative retail electric 22    supplier. With respect to any contract made under this 23    subsection (i), the corporate authorities shall include in 24    the annual appropriation ordinance for each fiscal year an 25    appropriation of a sum of money sufficient to pay the 26    amount which, by the terms of the contract, is to become   SB2044 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09555 RTM 19618 b1    due and payable during that fiscal year.2        (j) To enter into licensing or management agreements 3    with not-for-profit corporations organized under the laws 4    of this State to operate park district facilities if the 5    corporation covenants to use the facilities to provide 6    public park or recreational programs for youth.7        (k) To allow a person to sign any document with a 8    web-based signature if the district uses a secure 9    web-based platform. 10(Source: P.A. 101-304, eff. 8-9-19; 102-999, eff. 5-27-22.) 11    Section 40. The Chicago Park District Act is amended by 12adding Section 7.08 as follows: 13    (70 ILCS 1505/7.08 new)14    Sec. 7.08. Web-based signature. The Chicago Park District 15may allow a person to sign any document with a web-based 16signature if the Chicago Park District uses a secure web-based 17platform. This Section does not apply to a nominating or 18candidate petition or a referendum petition.